Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.110

Disability boards authorized—Composition—Terms—Reimbursement for travel expenses—Duties.

(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized to be created in this section.

(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by those cities and composed of the following five members: Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor; one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the elected members shall serve a two year term. If there are either no firefighters or law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers or firefighters eligible to vote. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for disability by firefighters or law enforcement officers as provided under the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system act.

(b) If no eligible active or retired firefighter or law enforcement officer is willing or able to be elected to the board under (a) of this subsection, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under (a) of this subsection:

(i) Any active or retired firefighter under this chapter or chapters 41.16, 41.18, and 52.26 RCW or law enforcement officers under this chapter or chapter 41.20 RCW who resides within the jurisdiction served by the board;

(ii) The surviving spouse or domestic partner of a firefighter or law enforcement officer subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

(c) Each county shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability board is established. The county disability board so created shall be composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a city disability board established pursuant to (a) of this subsection to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county which does not contain a city disability board; one active firefighter or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the firefighters employed or retired from an employer within the county who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from an employer within the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired from an employer within the county who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; and one member from the public at large who resides within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the county are eligible for election. All members appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by the firefighters eligible to vote.

(d) If no eligible active or retired firefighter or law enforcement officer is willing or able to be elected to the board under (c) of this subsection, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under (c) of this subsection:

(i) Any active or retired firefighter under this chapter or chapters 41.16, 41.18, and 52.26 RCW or law enforcement officers under this chapter or chapter 41.20 RCW who resides within the jurisdiction served by the board;

(ii) The surviving spouse or domestic partner of a firefighter or law enforcement officer subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.

(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all such determinations as specified in this chapter.

[ 2020 c 107 s 7. Prior: 2013 c 213 s 1; 2013 c 23 s 69; 2005 c 66 s 1; 2003 c 30 s 3; 2000 c 234 s 1; 1988 c 164 s 1; 1982 c 12 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 9; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 219 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 66: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 15, 2005]." [ 2005 c 66 s 2.]

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 41.26.030.